Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1633
Storage elevation, defined.

Storage elevation means the elevation of the reservoir surface associated with a level of impoundment, such as maximum storage or normal storage.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 33.